Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1220
Terms, defined.

As used in sections 48-1219 to 48-1227.01, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Employee shall mean any individual employed by an employer, including individuals employed by the state or any of its political subdivisions including public bodies;

(2) Employer shall mean any person engaged in an industry who has fifteen or more employees for each working day in each of twenty or more calendar weeks in the current or preceding calendar year, any agent of such person, and any party whose business is financed in whole or in part under the Nebraska Investment Finance Authority Act, and includes the State of Nebraska, its governmental agencies, and political subdivisions, regardless of the number of employees, but such term shall not include the United States, a corporation wholly owned by the government of the United States, or an Indian tribe;

(3) Wage rate shall mean all compensation for employment including payment in kind and amounts paid by employers for employee benefits as defined by the commission in regulations issued under sections 48-1219 to 48-1227;

(4) Employ shall include to suffer or permit to work;

(5) Commission shall mean the Equal Opportunity Commission; and

(6) Person shall include one or more individuals, partnerships, limited liability companies, corporations, legal representatives, trustees, trustees in bankruptcy, or voluntary associations.

Laws 1969, c. 389, § 2, p. 1366;

Laws 1983, LB 424, § 5;

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 75;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 299;

Laws 2005, LB 10, § 1.

Nebraska Investment Finance Authority Act, see section 58-201.